Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-332
Program; established; fiber optic cable; funding; public libraries; required contributions.

(1) The Public Service Commission shall establish the Nebraska E-Rate Special Construction Matching Fund Program. Beginning July 1, 2021, the program shall receive funding from the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund to provide incentives for fiber optic cable to be constructed to benefit public libraries.

(2) The commission shall establish criteria and priorities for funding by establishing a support mechanism to deploy fiber optic cable for the benefit of public library access to E-Rate special construction matching funding.

(3) The commission may use its discretion in determining the amount of funding required to be contributed by any public library in order to receive matching funds from the program.

Laws 2020, LB992, § 9.